Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 27. Hospital Liens

38-27-101.
Lien for hospital care - definition.

Before a lien is created, every hospital duly licensed by the department of public health and environment, pursuant to part 1 of article 3 of title 25, C.R.S., which furnishes services to any person injured as the result of the negligence or other wrongful acts of another person and not covered by the provisions of the “Workers’ Compensation Act of Colorado”, articles 40 to 47 of title 8, C.R.S., shall submit all reasonable and necessary charges for hospital care or other services for payment to the property and casualty insurer and the primary medical payer of benefits available to and identified by or on behalf of the injured person, in the same manner as used by the hospital for patients who are not injured as the result of the negligence or wrongful acts of another person, to the extent permitted by state and federal law.

If no payers of benefits are identified for the injured person due to lack of insurance, a lien may be created.

If a hospital is notified of a payer of benefits after it creates a lien, the hospital shall make good-faith attempts to submit reasonable and necessary charges for hospital care or other services to the identified payer in the same manner as used by the hospital for patients who are not injured as the result of the negligence or wrongful acts of another person.

After a hospital satisfies the requirements of this section, and subject to this article, the hospital shall have a lien for all reasonable and necessary charges for hospital care upon the net amount payable to the injured person or to his or her heirs, assigns, or legal representatives out of the total amount of any recovery or sum had or collected, or to be collected, whether by judgment, settlement, or compromise, by the person or his or her heirs or legal representatives as damages on account of the injuries.

Nothing in this section authorizes a hospital to collect or attempt to collect money from a person as prohibited by section 8-42-101 (4), 8-43-207 (1)(o), or 10-16-705 (3), C.R.S.

Nothing in this section changes any obligation of the hospital or its agents under the “Colorado Medical Assistance Act”, articles 4 to 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S.

An injured person who is subject to a lien in violation of this section may bring an action in a district court to recover two times the amount of the lien attempted to be asserted.

The lien of attorneys- and counselors-at-law created by section 13-93-114 has precedence over and is senior to the lien created under this section. This article 27 does not apply to any hospital charges incurred after the date of any such judgment, settlement, or compromise.

For purposes of this section, “payer of benefits” means:

An insurer;

A health maintenance organization;

A health benefit plan;

A preferred provider organization;

An employee benefit plan;

A program of medical assistance under the “Colorado Medical Assistance Act”, articles 4 to 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S.;

The children’s basic health plan, article 8 of title 25.5, C.R.S.;

Any other insurance policy or plan; or

Any other benefit available as a result of a contract entered into and paid for by or on behalf of an injured person.

History.

Source:
L. 67:

P. 880, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-8-1.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 574, § 72, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2805, § 577, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (SB 15-265), ch. 260, p. 981, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(8) amended, (SB 17-227), ch. 192, p. 705, § 6, effective August 9.

38-27-102.
Notice of lien.

Such lien shall take effect if, prior to any such judgment, settlement, or compromise, a written notice of lien containing the name and address of the injured person, the date of the accident, the name and location of the hospital, and the name of the person alleged to be liable to the injured person for the injuries received is filed by the hospital in the office of the secretary of state. Hospital liens properly recorded with the division of insurance prior to July 1, 1994, shall be valid and enforceable without filing with the office of the secretary of state. Within ten days after such filing, the hospital shall mail by certified mail, return receipt requested, a copy of said notice to such injured person at the last address provided to the hospital by such person, to his or her attorney, if known, to the persons alleged to be liable to such injured person for the injuries sustained, if known, and to the insurance carriers, if known, which have insured such persons alleged to be liable against such liability. If an action for damages on account of such injuries or death is pending, the requirements of notice contained in this section shall be satisfied by the filing of the said notice of lien in the pending action, with copies thereof to the attorneys of record for the parties thereto.

History.

Source:
L. 67:

P. 880, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-8-2.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1555, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 754, § 27, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 1433, § 15, effective July 1.

38-27-103.
Enforcement of lien and limitation of action.

Any person, private or corporate, who pays over any money to any such injured person, his attorney, heirs, assigns, or legal representatives against whom there is a lien as provided in this article of which he has received notice as provided in this article is liable to the hospital having such lien for the amount thereof not exceeding the net amount paid to such injured person, his heirs, assigns, or legal representatives. Any action under this section shall be commenced within one year after the date of such payment, and the court shall allow a reasonable attorney’s fee for the collection and enforcement of such lien.

History.

Source:
L. 67:

P. 881, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-8-3.

38-27-104.
Hospital to furnish itemized statement.

Upon receipt of a written request mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, from any person notified of such lien in accordance with the provisions of section 38-27-102, such hospital shall, within ten days after receipt of such request, furnish such person with an itemized statement of all charges for which the lien is claimed. If such injured person has not been discharged from said hospital at the time such request is received, then the hospital shall recite that hospitalization or medical treatments are continuing and shall furnish the said itemized statement within ten days after such person has been discharged from said hospital. In addition to being furnished the said itemized statement, the person, private or corporate, against whom the lien is asserted shall also be permitted to examine the financial records of the said hospital in reference to the services furnished for which the hospital is asserting a lien.

History.

Source:
L. 67:

P. 881, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-8-4.

38-27-105.
Assignment of lien.

Any party claiming a lien under the provisions of this article may assign, in writing, his claim and lien to any other party, who shall thereafter have all the rights and remedies of the assignor.

History.

Source:
L. 67:

P. 881, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-8-5.

38-27-106.
Applicability.

This article shall apply only to liens for hospital services and care rendered on or after June 12, 1967.

History.

Source:
L. 67:

P. 881, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-8-6.